Tennessee, session 114, SB0590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-113, is amended by adding the
following as a new subdivision:
(d) By September 1, 2025, the registry of election finance shall issue a report to
the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the legislative
librarian, and the office of legislative budget analysis on the use of digital currency being
contributed to candidates and political campaign committees throughout the last five (5)
years.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0590
000889
- 1 -